Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-1537
Department, defined.

Department shall mean the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment.

Laws 1979, LB 120, § 4;

Laws 1993, LB 3, § 50;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 113;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 406.
September 30, 2030